North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159D. The North Carolina Capital Facilities Financing Act.
Article 2. Private Capital Facilities Finance Act.
§ 159D-47.
Revenues; pledges of revenues.

The agency is authorized to fix and to collect fees, loan repayments, purchase price payments, rents and charges for the use of any project, and any part or section of the project and to contract with any participating institution for its use. The agency may require that the participating institution operate, repair or maintain such project and bear the cost and other costs of the agency in connection with the project all as may be provided in the agreement of sale or lease, loan agreement or other contract with the agency, in addition to other obligations imposed under the agreement or contract.

The fees, loan repayments, purchase price payments, rents and charges shall be fixed so as to provide a fund sufficient, with any other available funds, (i) to pay the costs of operating, repairing and maintaining the project to the extent that adequate provision for the payment of such costs has not otherwise been provided for, (ii) to pay the principal of and the interest on all bonds or notes as they become due and payable and (iii) to create and maintain any reserves provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of, or any trust agreement securing, the bonds. The fees, loan repayments, purchase price payments, rents and charges may be applied or pledged to the payment of debt service on the bonds prior to the payment of the costs of operating, repairing and maintaining the project.

All pledges of fees, loan repayments, purchase price payments, rents, charges and other revenues under the provisions of this Article are valid and binding from the time when they are made. All revenues so pledged and thereafter received by the agency are immediately subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery or further act, and the lien of the pledge is valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the agency, irrespective of whether the parties have notice of it. The resolution or any trust agreement by which a pledge is created or any loan agreement, agreement of sale or lease need not be filed or recorded except in the records of the agency.

The State of North Carolina pledges to and agrees with the holders of any bonds or notes issued by the agency that so long as any of the bonds or notes are outstanding and unpaid the State will not limit or alter the rights vested in the agency at the time of issuance of the bonds or notes to fix, revise, charge, and collect or cause to be fixed, revised, charged and collected loan repayments, purchase price payments, rents, fees and charges for the use of or services rendered by any project in connection with which the bonds or notes were issued, so as to provide a fund sufficient, with any other available funds to pay the costs of operating, repairing and maintaining the project, to pay the principal of and the interest on all bonds and notes as they become due and payable, to create and maintain any reserves provided for their payment, and to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the bondholders or noteholders. The State will not in any way impair the rights and remedies of the bondholders or noteholders until the bonds or notes and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceedings by or on behalf of the bondholders or noteholders, are fully paid, met and discharged.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 13; 1998-124, s. 10; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-48.
Trust funds.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, all moneys received pursuant to the authority of this Article, including fees, loan repayments, purchase price payments, rents, charges, insurance proceeds, condemnation awards and any other revenues and funds received in connection with any project, are trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this Article. The resolution authorizing the issuance of, or any trust agreement securing, any bonds or notes may provide that any of these moneys may be temporarily invested pending their disbursement and shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys are deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply them for the purposes of this Article, subject to any limitations provided in this Article and in the resolution or trust agreement. The moneys may be invested as provided in

G.S. 159-30

, as it may from time to time be amended.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 14; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-49.
Remedies.

Any holder of bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this Article or any coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or notes, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust agreement or resolution, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State or granted hereunder or under such trust agreement or resolution, or under any other contract executed by the agency pursuant to this Article, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this Article or by such trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the agency or by any officer of the agency.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 15; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-50.
Investment securities.

All bonds, notes and interest coupons issued under this Article are investment securities within the meaning of and for all the purposes of Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code as enacted in this State, whether or not they are of such form and character as to be investment securities under that Article, subject only to the provisions of the bonds and notes pertaining to registration.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 16; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-51.
Bonds or notes eligible for investment.

Bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this Article are securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the State and its political subdivisions, and all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. These bonds or notes are securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any State or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the State for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds, notes or obligations of this State is authorized by law.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 17; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-52.
Refunding bonds or notes.

The agency is authorized to provide for the issuance of refunding bonds or notes for the purpose of refunding any bonds or notes then outstanding which have been issued under the provisions of this Article, including the payment of any redemption premium and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of the bonds or notes and, if considered advisable by the agency, for any corporate purpose of the agency, including, without limitation:

Constructing improvements, additions, extensions or enlargements of the project in connection with which the bonds or notes to be refunded shall have been issued, and

Paying all or any part of the cost of any additional project.

The issuance of refunding bonds or notes, their maturities and other details the rights of their holders, and the rights, duties and obligations of the agency are governed by the provisions of this Article which relate to the issuance of bonds or notes, as appropriate.Refunding bonds may be sold or exchanged for outstanding bonds issued under this Article and, if sold, their proceeds, and investment earnings on them, may be applied, with any other available funds, to the purchase, redemption, or payment of the bonds being refunded, to the payment of any interest on the refunding bonds, and to the payment of any expenses in connection with the refunding. The proceeds may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America if the obligations mature or are subject to redemption by the holders, at their option not later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accrued thereon, will be required for the purposes intended.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 18; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-53.
Annual report.

The agency shall, promptly following the close of each fiscal year, submit an annual report of its activities under this Article for the preceding year to the Governor, the State Auditor, the General Assembly, and the Local Government Commission. The agency shall cause an audit of its books and accounts relating to its activities under this Article to be made at least once in each year by an independent certified public accountant and the cost of the audit may be paid from any available moneys of the agency.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 19; 2000-179, s. 2; 2010-96, s. 34.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-96, s. 34, effective July 20, 2010, deleted “the Advisory Budget Commission” following “the General Assembly” in the first sentence.

§ 159D-54.
Officers not liable.

No member or officer of the agency shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance or execution of any bonds or notes.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 20; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-55.
Tax exemption.

The exercise of the powers granted by this Article will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the State and will promote their health and welfare.

Any bonds or notes issued by the agency under the provisions of this Article are at all times be free from taxation by the State or any local unit or political subdivision or other instrumentality of the State, excepting inheritance or gift taxes, income taxes on the gain from the transfer of the bonds and notes, and franchise taxes. The interest on the bonds and notes is not subject to taxation as income.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 21; 1995, c. 46, s. 5; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-56.
Conflict of interest.

If any member, officer or employee of the agency is interested either directly or indirectly, or is an officer or employee of or has an ownership interest in any firm or corporation interested directly or indirectly, in any contract with the agency, this interest shall be disclosed to the agency and shall be set forth in the minutes of the agency, and the member, officer or employee having an interest in a contract shall not participate on behalf of the agency in the authorization of the contract.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 22; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-57.
Additional method.

The foregoing sections of this Article provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized and are supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws. This Article does not derogate any existing powers. The issuance of bonds or notes under the provisions of this Article need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds or notes.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 23; 2000-179, s. 2.

§§ 159D-58 through 159D-64.

Reserved for future codification purposes.